Wyoming, session 2025, HB0251.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-3-308 is created to read:

6-3-308. Criminal trespass by drone; penalties.

(a) Except as otherwise permitted by law, a person is
guilty of criminal trespass by drone if the person causes a
drone to operate at an altitude of two hundred (200) feet
or lower over the private land or residence of another
person without authorization by the landowner or resident
HB0251

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0606
or pursuant to a court order. For purposes of this section,
"drone" means an unmanned aircraft weighing not more than
fifty-five (55) pounds on takeoff, including everything
that is on board or otherwise attached to the unmanned
aircraft.

(b) Criminal trespass by drone is a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6)
months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars
($750.00), or both.

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0251